Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF1030.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2526HV (2) 91 jm/jh H.F. 1030 Section 1. Section 422.7, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 45. a. For a taxpayer whose net income is 3 less than one hundred fifty-five thousand dollars, subtract, 4 to the extent included, the amount of qualified tips that 5 were received and are included on statements furnished to an 6 employer as required by section 6053(a) of the Internal Revenue 7 Code, not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars. 8 b. As used in this subsection: 9 (1) âNet incomeâ means net income as properly computed 10 under this section without regard to the deduction in this 11 subsection. 12 (2) âQualified tipsâ means any cash tip received by an 13 individual in the course of such individualâs employment in an 14 occupation that traditionally and customarily received cash 15 tips before December 31, 2023. 16 c. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 17 to administer this subsection. 18 Sec. 2. CONTINGENT APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to tax 19 years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, unless the federal 20 government enacts legislation allowing for the deduction of 21 qualified tips for federal individual income tax purposes, 22 and in such a case this Act does not apply in the same tax 23 year where federal legislation allowing for the deduction of 24 qualified tips for federal individual income tax purposes 25 applies. 26